District of Columbia statutes.
47-814

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this act.

Nov. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-37, § 7, 26 DCR 1564
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-814.
1973 Ed., § 47-632.2.
“This act”, referred to at the end of this section, is D.C. Law 3-37, the Real Property Tax Classifications Act for Tax Year 1980.